Utah statutes.
67-20-3.   Purposes for which a volunteer is considered a government employee.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (3), a volunteer is considered a government employee for purposes of:

(a)  receiving workers' compensation medical benefits, which shall be the exclusive remedy for all injuries and occupational diseases as provided under Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act, and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act;

(b)  the operation of a motor vehicle or equipment if the volunteer is properly licensed and authorized to do so; and

(c)  liability protection and indemnification normally afforded paid a government employee.

(2) (a)  A supervising agency shall provide workers' compensation benefits for a volunteer safety officer as provided in Section 67-20-7.

(b) A volunteer safety officer is considered an employee of the supervising agency of the volunteer safety officer for purposes of Subsections (1)(b) and (c).

(3) (a)  The county of a county sheriff that certifies and supervises a volunteer search and rescue team member shall provide workers' compensation benefits for the volunteer search and rescue team member as provided in Section 67-20-7.5.

(b)  For purposes of Subsections (1)(b) and (c), a volunteer search and rescue team member is considered an employee of the county of the county sheriff that certifies and supervises the volunteer search and rescue team member.

